Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There are appropriated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,
for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the following amounts, for
the following purposes:
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission programs and
operations ............................. $ 87,294,874
(2) Public university operations
and student support
for distribution to
public universities.................  $ 1,006,164,482
(3) Community College Support
Fund for distribution to
community colleges and
community college service
districts and school
districts................................. $ 800,000,000
(4) Oregon Opportunity Grant ... $ 183,776,003
(5) Oregon Promise grants ......... $ 44,252,681
(6) Oregon Tribal Student Grant $ 24,245,859
(7) Oregon National Guard
tuition assistance .................. $ 5,119,455
(8) Oregon Health and Science
University education and
other programs ..................... $ 139,292,377
(9) Public university statewide
programs............................... $ 59,248,952
(10) Statewide public services ...... $ 180,611,441
(11) Debt service and related costs:
(a) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
Enrolled House Bill 5025 (HB 5025-A) Page 1
for the benefit of Oregon
public universities................. $ 263,112,900
(b) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
for the benefit of Oregon
community colleges ............... $ 39,711,540
(c) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds
sold for the benefit of
Oregon Health and Science
University ............................. $ 23,575,130
(d) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
for implementing the Financial
Assistant Management Information
Systems project .................... $ 1,443,880
(e) Repayment of energy loans
made to Oregon public
universities by State
Department of Energy .......... $ 13,119,216
(f) Debt-related costs on bonds
sold for the benefit of
Oregon public universities .... $ 1,249,211
(g) Debt-related costs on bonds
sold for the benefit of Oregon
community colleges ............... $ 162,662
SECTION 2.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$33,308,670 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for debt service
on lottery bonds sold for the benefit of Oregon public universities.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$11,821,800 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from the  Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission for debt service
on lottery bonds sold for the benefit of Oregon community colleges.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$56,406,064 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Higher Education  Coordinating Commission to the Outdoor
School Education Fund.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$18,329,943 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  from lottery moneys
allocated to the Sports Lottery Account.
SECTION 6. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$84,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses from lottery  moneys distributed from the Education Stability Fund to
the Higher Education Coordinating Commission for Oregon Opportunity Grants.
SECTION 7. (1) In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appro-
priated to the Emergency Board, for the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, out of the General
Fund, the amount of $18,735,518, to be  allocated to the Higher Education Coordinating Com-
Enrolled House Bill 5025 (HB 5025-A) Page 2
mission to award grants to Portland  State University and Oregon’s technical regional uni-
versities (Oregon  Institute of Technology, Southern Oregon University, Eastern Oregon
University and Western Oregon University) to assist these institutions with  long-term fi-
nancial sustainability.
(2) If  any of the moneys appropriated by subsection (1) of this section are not allocated
by the Emergency Board  prior to December 1, 2024, the moneys remaining on that date be-
come available for any purpose for which the Emergency Board lawfully may allocate  funds.
SECTION 8. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds  and federal funds and funds described in sections 12 to 16 of this 2023
Act, collected or received by the Higher Education Coordinating  Commission, for the fol-
lowing purposes:
(1) Higher Education Coordinating
Commission programs and
related grants ........................... $115,100,094
(2) Debt service on outstanding
general obligation bonds sold
for the benefit of Oregon
Health and Science University .. $ 7,328,750
(3) Debt service on outstanding
lottery bonds and general
obligation bonds sold for
the benefit of Oregon public
universities ............................... $ 3,957,430
SECTION 9.
Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$20,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for
payment of expenses  by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal  Recovery Fund moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services and  transferred to the commission for carrying out
the provisions of sections 3 and 3a, chapter 28, Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 10. Notwithstanding any  other law limiting expenditures, the amount of
$91,808,631 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit  for
payment of expenses by the Higher Education Coordinating Commission  from American
Rescue Plan Act Coronavirus State Fiscal Recovery Fund  moneys received by the Oregon
Department of Administrative Services and transferred to the  commission for carrying out
the provisions of sections 9 and 11, chapter 28, Oregon Laws 2022.
SECTION 11. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$135,765,439 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from federal funds, excluding  federal funds described in section 14 of
this 2023 Act, collected or received by the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, for
Higher Education Coordinating Commission programs and related grants.
SECTION 12. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $98,626
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses by the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission from the moneys received
from the Western Oregon Timber Severance Tax  Fund and the Eastern Oregon Timber
Severance Tax Fund for the Community College Support Fund.
SECTION 13.
For the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for debt service on general obligation bonds and certificates
of participation issued for the  benefit of public universities and Oregon Health and Science
University and paid with resources received from the public universities  and Oregon Health
and Science University are not limited.
Enrolled House Bill 5025 (HB 5025-A) Page 3
SECTION 14. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for payments to individuals, organizations  or units of gov-
ernment from federal National Emergency Grants funds are not limited.
SECTION 15. For the biennium beginning July  1, 2023, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission for debt service on Build  America Bonds sold for the benefit
of public universities and community colleges are not limited.
SECTION 16. For the biennium beginning July 1,  2023, expenditures by the Higher Edu-
cation Coordinating Commission of moneys from the Tuition Protection Fund are not limited.
SECTION 17. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Passed by House June 13, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5025 (HB 5025-A) Page 4